Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska
38-162

Boards; membership.

Except as otherwise provided in the Uniform Credentialing Act:

(1) Each board shall consist of four members;

(2) Each board shall have at least one public member; and

(3) If a board has eleven or more members, it shall have at least three public
members.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 13, p. 457;

C.S.1929, § 71-303;

Laws 1943, c. 150, § 5, p. 540;

R.S.1943, § 71-113;

Laws 1963, c. 408, § 4, p. 1311;

Laws 1971, LB 587, § 2;

Laws 1978, LB 406, § 5;

Laws 1979, LB 427, § 6;

Laws 1980, LB 94, § 3;

Laws 1983, LB 476, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 481, § 10;

Laws 1985, LB 129, § 6;

Laws 1986, LB 277, § 6;

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 33;

Laws 1986, LB 355, § 12;

Laws 1986, LB 579, § 25;

Laws 1987, LB 473, § 8;

Laws 1988, LB 557, § 17;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 9;

Laws 1993, LB 669, § 7;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 4;

Laws 1995, LB 406, § 15;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 17;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 108;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 80;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-113;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 62.